src/morphology/compounding.lexc
! ========================= !
!! !!!Compounding morphology
! ========================= !


! Compounds

LEXICON R
@P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ RReal ; ! Flags to control compounding

LEXICON RReal
 +Cmpnd#: Nouns ;
          R-    ;

LEXICON R-
 +Cmpnd#:%- Nouns ;

LEXICON RNum
      +Cmp/Hyph+Cmpnd#:-# Nouns ; ! For Num Cmp Noun, vi vil ikke ha Num Cmp Num
